Alaska, session 34, HB377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 40.21.150(6) is amended to read: 06 (6) "record" means any document, paper, book, letter, electronic mail, 07 drawing, map, plat, photo, photographic file, motion picture film, audio or video 08 recording, microfilm, microphotograph, exhibit, magnetic or paper tape, punched 09 card, electronic record, or other document of any other material, regardless of physical 10 form or characteristic, developed or received under law or in connection with the 11 transaction of official business and preserved or appropriate for preservation by an 12 agency or a political subdivision, as evidence of the organization, function, policies, 13 decisions, procedures, operations, or other activities of the state or political 14 subdivision or because of the informational value in them; the term does not include 01 library and museum material developed or acquired and preserved solely for reference, 02 historical, or exhibition purposes, extra copies of documents preserved solely for 03 convenience of reference, or stocks of publications and processed documents; 04 * Sec. 2. AS 40.25.110 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 05 (j) Notwithstanding (c) of this section, a municipality may require a requester 06 to pay the municipality's actual personnel costs to perform the search, review, 07 redaction, and copying tasks to complete a request for production of a record. The 08 personnel costs may not exceed the actual salary and benefit costs for the personnel 09 time required to complete the request. The requester shall pay the costs before the 10 records are disclosed, and the municipality may require payment in advance of the 11 search. 12 (k) Notwithstanding (c) of this section, the Department of Public Safety may 13 require a requester to pay the actual personnel costs of the Department of Public 14 Safety to perform the search, review, redaction, and copying tasks to complete a 15 request for production of a record. The personnel costs may not exceed the actual 16 salary and benefit costs for the personnel time required to complete the request. The 17 requester shall pay the costs before the records are disclosed, and the Department of 18 Public Safety may require payment in advance of the search. 19 * Sec. 3. AS 40.25.220(3) is amended to read: 20 (3) "public records" means books, papers, files, audio or video 21 recordings, accounts, writings, including electronic mail, drafts, [AND] 22 memorializations of conversations, and other items, regardless of format or physical 23 characteristics, that are developed or received by a public agency, or by a private 24 contractor for a public agency, and that are preserved for [THEIR] informational value 25 or as evidence of the organization or operation of the public agency; "public records" 26 does not include proprietary software programs. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.